Washington statutes.
RCW 11.44.015

Inventory and appraisement—Filing—Copy distribution.

(1) Within three months after appointment, unless a longer time shall be granted by the court, every personal representative shall make and verify by affidavit a true inventory and appraisement of all of the property of the estate passing under the will or by laws of intestacy and which shall have come to the personal representative's possession or knowledge, including a statement of all encumbrances, liens, or other secured charges against any item. The personal representative shall determine the fair net value, as of the date of the decedent's death, of each item contained in the inventory after deducting the encumbrances, liens, and other secured charges on the item. Such property shall be classified as follows:

(a) Real property, by legal description;

(b) Stocks and bonds;

(c) Mortgages, notes, and other written evidences of debt;

(d) Bank accounts and money;

(e) Furniture and household goods;

(f) All other personal property accurately identified, including the decedent's proportionate share in any partnership, but no inventory of the partnership property shall be required of the personal representative.

(2) The inventory and appraisement may, but need not be, filed in the probate cause, but upon receipt of a written request for a copy of the inventory and appraisement from any heir, legatee, devisee, unpaid creditor who has filed a claim, or beneficiary of a nonprobate asset from whom contribution is sought under RCW 11.18.200, or from the department of revenue, the personal representative shall furnish to the person, within ten days of receipt of a request, a true and correct copy of the inventory and appraisement.

[ 1997 c 252 s 41; 1967 c 168 s 9; 1965 c 145 s 11.44.015. Formerly RCW 11.44.010, part and 11.44.020, part.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Inventory and appraisement on death of partner—Filing: RCW 11.64.002.